Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1926
Repealed. Laws 2013, LB341, § 22. Operative date January 1, 2015. Foreclosure of tax lien by county under old law; action to attack; prerequisite, payment of taxes and costs.

In the event any person, persons, firm or corporation or governmental body shall bring any action or proceeding whatever to contest the validity of any of the tax foreclosure proceedings by such a county, under any one or more of sections 77-1923 to 77-1925, or any deeds to the county or from the county, then such person, persons, firm, corporation or governmental body shall first pay to the clerk of the district court in which the action shall have been had, all taxes levied or assessed against said premises for the years foreclosed on, with interest and penalties provided by law, and all court costs in the tax foreclosure proceeding charged against the real estate, and shall pay to the county treasurer of the county all taxes levied or assessed against said premises subsequent to the taxes foreclosed upon, with interest and penalties provided by law, which are liens upon the property at the time such action or proceeding shall be commenced. The paying of such taxes and court costs shall be a prerequisite to the filing of any such action or proceeding.

Laws 1943, c. 184, § 4, p. 633;

R.S.1943, § 77-1926.